Wisconsin, session 2025, AB652.
do enact as follows:AB652,11Section 1. 108.022 of the statutes is created to read:AB652,2,62108.022 Electronic payments and filings; good cause. For purposes of 3requirements to use electronic filing, payment, or interchange methods specified 4under ss. 108.14 (2e), 108.17 (2b) and (7) (a), 108.185, and 108.205 (2), good cause 5for not using such method includes all of the following, as determined by the 6department:AB652,2,77(1) Having limited or no Internet access.AB652,3,11(2) Having digital literacy limitations.AB652,3,42(3) Having communication barriers, such as having a vision or other 3disability that prevents the ease of using the electronic method or having limited or 4no English proficiency.AB652,3,65(4) The presence of other circumstances that make use of the electronic 6method unusually difficult for the person, as determined by the department.AB652,27Section 2. 108.04 (1) (hg) of the statutes is created to read:AB652,3,98108.04 (1) (hg) 1. An employing unit may report to the department whenever 9any of the following occurs:AB652,3,1010a. An individual declines a job interview offer with the employing unit.AB652,3,1111b. An individual declines a job offer with the employing unit.AB652,3,1312c. An individual fails to attend a scheduled job interview with the employing 13unit.AB652,3,1514d. An individual fails to report for their first scheduled day of work with the 15employing unit.AB652,3,20162. The department shall investigate each report submitted under subd. 1. as 17needed to determine whether the report affects a claimant’s eligibility for benefits 18under this chapter as provided in subs. (2) (hL) and (8) (bm). The department shall 19disregard a report submitted under subd. 1. if the claimant has good cause for the 20circumstances in the report.AB652,321Section 3. 108.04 (2) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:AB652,4,522108.04 (2) (h) A claimant shall, when the claimant first files a claim for 23benefits under this chapter and during each subsequent week the claimant files for 1benefits under this chapter, inform the department whether he or she is receiving 2social security disability insurance payments, as defined in sub. (12) (f) 2m s. 3108.05 (7m) (b). If the claimant is receiving social security disability insurance 4payments, the claimant shall, in the manner prescribed by the department, report 5to the department the amount of the social security disability insurance payments.AB652,46Section 4. 108.04 (2) (hL) of the statutes is created to read:AB652,4,137108.04 (2) (hL) 1. Subject to subd. 2., if a claimant is subject to the 8requirement under par. (a) 3. to conduct a reasonable search for suitable work for a 9given week and the department receives one or more verified reports submitted by 10an employing unit concerning an employee under sub. (1) (hg) 1. a. or c. for a given 11week that are not disregarded under sub. (1) (hg) 2., the claimant shall not be 12considered to have conducted a reasonable search for suitable work in that week 13under par. (a) 3.AB652,514Section 5. 108.04 (8) (bm) of the statutes is created to read:AB652,4,1915108.04 (8) (bm) Subject to pars. (d) to (em), if the department receives one or 16more verified reports submitted by an employing unit concerning an employee 17under sub. (1) (hg) 1. b. or d. for a given week that are not disregarded under sub. (1) 18(hg) 2., and the employee is not otherwise disqualified under this subsection, the 19employee is ineligible to receive benefits for that week.AB652,620Section 6. 108.04 (11) (cm) of the statutes is renumbered 108.04 (11) (cm) 1. 21and amended to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab652 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab652 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB652 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB652 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB652: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting